Hawaii statutes.
[§196-19] Life-cycle cost analysis.
Agencies shall use life-cycle cost analysis in making decisions about their
investments in products, services, construction, and other projects to lower
the State's costs and to reduce energy and water consumption. Where
appropriate, agencies shall consider the life-cycle costs of combinations of
projects, particularly to encourage bundling of energy efficiency projects with
renewable energy projects.

Agencies shall retire inefficient equipment on
an accelerated basis where replacement results in lower life-cycle costs.
Agencies that minimize life-cycle costs with efficiency measures shall be
recognized in their scorecard evaluations established under section 196-17(a).
[L 2002, c 77, pt of §9]

Note

Section 196-17(a) referred to in text is repealed.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next